North Carolina, session 2025, HB923.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 132 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 132-20. Removal of personal identifying information from public websites; judicial
personnel.
(a) Any judicial official may request, in writing, that all personal identifying information
be removed from any website, online computer database, or geographical information system
maintained by any public agency and available to the general public, provided the request
includes all of the following:
(1) The name of the judicial official.
(2) Information indicating the judicial official is eligible to make the request.
(3) The specific personal identifying information to be removed.
(b) Each public agency shall develop and make available a process by which any judicial
official may request removal of that individual's personal identifying information from any
website, online computer database, or geographical information system maintained by the public
agency and available to the general public. The request to remove personal identifying
information may also include a request to remove the personal identifying information of the
individual's spouse.
(c) The public agency must remove the personal identifying information if requested in
accordance with this section. The personal identifying information removed in accordance with
this section shall not be made available online again unless the public agency receives a written
revocation from the judicial official who made the original request. Personal identifying
information removed in accordance with this section continues to be a public record if it would
otherwise be subject to disclosure under this Chapter.
(d) Neither the request to remove the personal identifying information nor the revocation
of the request is a public record as defined by G.S. 132-1, and the public agency shall keep the
request and any revocation confidential.
(e) A public agency and its officers, officials, employees, and agents, both past and
present, in their official and individual capacity, shall be immune and held harmless from liability
in any action brought by or on behalf of any person injured or harmed by the action or inaction,
in good faith, of the public agency or its officers, officials, employees, and agents in
*H923-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
implementing the provisions of this section. However, if the actions of an officer, official,
employee, or agent which result in harm were not within the course and scope of the duties of
the officer, official, employee, or agent, the officer, official, employee, or agent may be subject
to liability as an individual to the extent permitted by the laws of this State.
(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Judicial official. – Any of the following individuals, while serving in that
capacity:
a. A magistrate.
b. A justice or judge of the general court of justice.
c. A district attorney or assistant district attorney.
d. An assistant attorney general employed by the North Carolina
Department of Justice.
e. A United States Attorney, Assistant United States Attorney, or Special
Assistant United States Attorney.
f. A public defender or assistant public defender.
g. A federal judge.
h. A clerk of the superior court.
i. A resource prosecutor employed by the Conference of District
Attorneys.
(2) Personal identifying information. – Excluding the name of the individual, any
of the following:
a. A physical residential address.
b. A personal phone number.
c. Any identifying information as defined in G.S. 14-113.20(b).
d. A birth certificate.
e. A marriage certificate."
SECTION 2. G.S. 132-6.1(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Notwithstanding G.S. 132-6.2(a), a public agency may satisfy the requirement under
G.S. 132-6 to provide access to public records in computer databases by making public records
in computer databases individually available online in a format that allows a person to view the
public record and print or save the public record to obtain a copy. A public agency that provides
access to public records under this subsection is not required to provide access to the public
records in the computer database in any other way; provided, however, that a a public agency
that provides access to public records under this subsection shall comply with G.S. 132-20 to
remove any personal identifying information from an online computer database upon the request
of a judicial official. A public agency that provides access to public records in computer databases
under this subsection shall also allow inspection of any of such public records that the public
agency also maintains in a nondigital medium."
SECTION 3. G.S. 132-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-10. Qualified exception for geographical information systems.
(a) Geographical information systems databases and data files developed and operated
by counties and cities are public records within the meaning of this Chapter. The county or city
shall provide public access to such systems by public access terminals or other output devices.
Upon request, the county or city shall furnish copies, in documentary or electronic form, to
anyone requesting them at reasonable cost. As a condition of furnishing an electronic copy,
whether on magnetic tape, magnetic disk, compact disk, or photo-optical device, a county or city
may require that the person obtaining the copy agree in writing that the copy will not be resold
or otherwise used for trade or commercial purposes.
(b) A county or city shall comply with G.S. 132-20 to remove any personal identifying
information from a geographical information system database upon the request of a judicial
official.
Page 2 House Bill 923-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) For purposes of this section, publication or broadcast by the news media, real estate
trade associations, or Multiple Listing Services operated by real estate trade associations shall
not constitute a resale or use of the data for trade or commercial purposes and use of information
without resale by a licensed professional in the course of practicing the professional's profession
shall not constitute use for a commercial purpose. For purposes of this section, resale at cost by
a real estate trade association or Multiple Listing Services operated by a real estate trade
association shall not constitute a resale or use of the data for trade or commercial purposes."
SECTION 4. G.S. 153A-98(c4) reads as rewritten:
"(c4) Even if considered part of an employee's personnel file, the following information
regarding any sworn law enforcement officer shall not be disclosed to an employee or any other
person, unless disclosed in accordance with G.S. 132-1.4, or in accordance with G.S. 132-1.10,
or for the personal safety of that sworn law enforcement officer or any other person residing in
the same residence:
(1) Information that might identify concerning the residence of a sworn law
enforcement officer.
(2) Emergency contact information.
(3) Any identifying information as defined in G.S. 14-113.20."
SECTION 5. G.S. 160A-168(c4) reads as rewritten:
"(c4) Even if considered part of an employee's personnel file, the following information
regarding any sworn law enforcement officer shall not be disclosed to an employee or any other
person, unless disclosed in accordance with G.S. 132-1.4, or in accordance with G.S. 132-1.10,
or for the personal safety of that sworn law enforcement officer or any other person residing in
the same residence:
(1) Information that might identify concerning the residence of a sworn law
enforcement officer.
(2) Emergency contact information.
(3) Any identifying information as defined in G.S. 14-113.20."
SECTION 6. This act is effective January 1, 2027.
House Bill 923-Second Edition Page 3